Utah statutes.
17-22-2.5.   Fees of sheriff.
(1)  The sheriff shall receive the following fees:
(a)  for serving a notice, rule, order, subpoena, garnishment, summons, or
summons and complaint, or garnishee execution, or other process by which an
action or proceeding is commenced, on each defendant, including copies when
furnished by plaintiff, $15;
(b)  for taking or approving a bond or undertaking in any case in which he is
authorized to take or approve a bond or undertaking, including justification,
$5;
(c)  for a copy of any writ, process or other paper when demanded or required
by law, for each folio, 50 cents;
(d)  for serving an attachment on property, or levying an execution, or
executing an order of arrest or an order for the delivery of personal
property, including copies when furnished by plaintiff, $50;
(e)  for taking and keeping possession of and preserving property under
attachment or execution or other process, the amount the court orders to a
maximum of $15 per day;
(f)  for advertising property for sale on execution, or any judgment, or order
of sale, exclusive of the cost of publication, $15;
(g)  for drawing and executing a sheriff's deed or a certificate of
redemption, exclusive of acknowledgment, $15, to be paid by the grantee;
(h)  for recording each deed, conveyance, or other instrument affecting real
estate, exclusive of the cost of recording, $10, to be paid by the grantee;
(i)  for serving a writ of possession or restitution, and putting any person
entitled to possession into possession of premises, and removing occupant,
$50;
(j)  for holding each trial of right of property, to include all services in
the matter, except mileage, $35;
(k)  for conducting, postponing, or canceling a sale of property, $15;
(l)  for taking a prisoner in civil cases from prison before a court or
magistrate, for each mile necessarily traveled, in going only, to a maximum of
100 miles, $1.50;
(m)  for taking a prisoner from the place of arrest to prison, in civil cases,
or before a court or magistrate, for each mile necessarily traveled, in going
only, to a maximum of 100 miles, $1.50;
(n)  for receiving and paying over money on execution or other process, as
follows:
(i)  if the amount collected does not exceed $1,000, 2% of this amount, with a
minimum of $1; and
(ii)  if the amount collected exceeds $1,000, 2% on the first $1,000 and
1-1/2% on the balance; and
(o)  for executing in duplicate a certificate of sale, exclusive of filing it,
$10.
(2)  The fees allowed by Subsection (1)(f) for the levy of execution and for
advertising shall be collected from the judgment debtor as part of the
execution in the same manner as the sum directed to be made.
(3)  When serving an attachment on property, an order of arrest, or an order
for the delivery of personal property, the sheriff may only collect traveling
fees for the distance actually traveled beyond the distance required to serve
the summons if the attachment or those orders:
(a)  accompany the summons in the action; and
(b)  may be executed at the time of the service of the summons.
(4) (a) (i)  When traveling generally to serve notices, orders, process, or
other papers, the sheriff may receive $1.50 for each mile necessarily
traveled, in going only, computed from the courthouse for each person served,
to a maximum of 100 miles.
(ii)  When transmitting notices, orders, process, or other papers by mail, the
sheriff may receive $1.50 for each mile necessarily traveled, in going only,
computed from the post office where received for each person served, to a
maximum of 100 miles.
(b)  The sheriff may only charge one mileage fee if any two or more papers are
required to be served in the same action or proceeding at the same time and at
the same address.
(c)  If it is necessary to make more than one trip to serve any notice, order,
process, or other paper, the sheriff may not collect more than two additional
mileage charges.
(5) (a)  For delivering an insane person to the Utah State Hospital, when the
cost of delivery is payable by private individuals, the sheriff may collect
$1.50 per mile for the distance from the county seat of his county to the Utah
State Hospital, to a maximum of 100 miles.
(b)  If the sheriff requires assistance to deliver the person to the Utah
State Hospital, the sheriff may also charge the actual and necessary cost of
that assistance.
(6)  For obtaining a saliva DNA specimen under Section 53-10-404, the sheriff
shall collect the fee of $100 in accordance with Section 53-10-404.
